Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group

47-18-70.
Establishment of the Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group; control and administration of such coverage group.

Pursuant to Article III, Section X of the Constitution of Georgia and Article VII, Section III, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, with due consideration to the limitations embodied therein, there is established a separate coverage group to be known as the Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group, membership of which shall consist of all state employees who are in the group to be covered for social security, the conditions of membership to be as established in Chapter 2 of this title governing the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

The Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group shall for the purposes of this Code section be under the jurisdiction and control of the State Personnel Board. Such board is authorized to establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to provide for payment of the contributions required under the Social Security Act and the proper administration of this Code section. Such board is further authorized to modify the present agreement with the secretary of health and human services for the purpose of extending the benefits of old-age, survivors, and disability insurance to members of such coverage group in a manner consistent with the terms of this chapter. Such coverage shall become effective not earlier than July 1, 1956.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 75, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 63; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 7/HB 997.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “State Personnel Board” for “Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (b).